Illinois, session 104th, SB1774.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.05g rep.)5    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.14.5 rep.)6    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 7repealing Sections 5-5.05g and 5-5.14.5. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 91, 2026.